District of Columbia statutes.
3-103

Meetings and hearings.

(a)

The Commission shall meet as necessary to conduct its official business.

(b)

A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum.

(c)

The Commission may act by an affirmative vote of at least 8 of its voting members.

(d)

The Commission may conduct public hearings, receive testimony, and call witnesses to assist the Commission in the exercise of its powers.

(e)

The Chairperson is authorized to administer an oath or affirmation to each witness.

Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-167, § 4, 45 DCR 5180
Oct. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-25, § 2(d), 54 DCR 8014
1981 Ed., § 2-4203.
D.C. Law 17-25, in subsec. (c), substituted “8” for “7”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of District of Columbia Sentencing and Criminal Code Revision Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-72, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7401).